Hawaii statutes.
§92F-22 Exemptions and limitations on
individual access. An agency is not required by this part to grant an
individual access to personal records, or information in such records:

(1) Maintained by an agency that performs as its or
as a principal function any activity pertaining to the prevention, control, or
reduction of crime, and which consist of:

(A) Information or reports prepared or
compiled for the purpose of criminal intelligence or of a criminal
investigation, including reports of informers, witnesses, and investigators; or

(B) Reports prepared or compiled at any stage
of the process of enforcement of the criminal laws from arrest or indictment
through confinement, correctional supervision, and release from supervision.

(2) The disclosure of which would reveal the identity
of a source who furnished information to the agency under an express or implied
promise of confidentiality.

(3) Consisting of testing or examination material or
scoring keys used solely to determine individual qualifications for appointment
or promotion in public employment, or used as or to administer a licensing
examination or an academic examination, the disclosure of which would
compromise the objectivity, fairness, or effectiveness of the testing or
examination process.

(4) Including investigative reports and materials,
related to an upcoming, ongoing, or pending civil or criminal action or
administrative proceeding against the individual.

(5) Required to be withheld from the individual to
whom it pertains by statute or judicial decision or authorized to be so
withheld by constitutional or statutory privilege. [L 1988, c 262, pt of §1; am
L 1993, c 250, §3]

Case Notes

Because plaintiff did not claim that the police department's
reliance on this section and §92F-13 was improper or unwarranted, the police
department was entitled to withhold documents under the sections. 937 F. Supp.
2d 1220 (2013).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next